Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 37.13.900.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the Board of Trustees of the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation;

“corporation” means the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation;

“fund” means the Alaska permanent fund established under art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1980; am § 25 ch 134 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

37.13.210

. Renumbered in 1993.